Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.430

Alternative direct petition method—Notice of hearing.

When a petition for annexation is filed with the legislative body of a code city, that meets the requirements of RCW 35A.01.040 and 35A.14.420, the legislative body may entertain the same, fix a date for a public hearing thereon and cause notice of the hearing to be published in one or more issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the city. The notice shall also be posted in three public places within the territory proposed for annexation, and shall specify the time and place of hearing and invite interested persons to appear and voice approval or disapproval of the annexation.

[ 2003 c 331 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 331: See notes following RCW 35.13.410.